District of Columbia statutes.
8-403.05

Notification to abutting properties.

A certified applicator or registered technician, before applying a restricted-use pesticide outside the confines of an enclosed structure, shall take reasonable actions to give notice of the date and approximate time of any such pesticide application to property that abuts the property to be treated.

History

Apr. 18, 1978, D.C. Law 2-70, § 4e
as added Oct. 23, 2012, D.C. Law 19-191, § 12(b), 59 DCR 10166

Effect of Amendments

The 2012 amendment by D.C. Law 19-191 added this section.

Editor's Notes

Applicability of D.C. Law 19-191: Section 14(a) of D.C. Law 19-191 provided that §§ 1 through 5 and 8 through 13 of the act shall apply as of October 1, 2013.